Utah statutes.
34-19-13.   Agreements against public policy.

Each of the following undertakings or promises hereafter made, whether written or oral, express or implied, between any employee or prospective employee and the employee's or prospective employee's employer, prospective employer, or any other individual, firm, company, association, or corporation, is contrary to public policy and may not be a basis for the granting of legal or equitable relief by any court against a party to the undertaking or promise, or against any other person who may advise, urge, or induce, without fraud, violence or threat of violence, either party to act in disregard of the undertaking or promise:

(1)  an undertaking or promise by either party to join or to remain a member of some specific labor organization or organizations or to join or remain a member of some specific employer organization or any employer organization or organizations;

(2)  an undertaking or promise by either party to not join or not remain a member of some specific labor organization or any labor organization or organizations, or of some specific employer organization or any employer organization or organizations; or

(3)  an undertaking or promise by either party to withdraw from an employment relation in the event that the party joins or remains a member of some specific labor organization or any labor organization or organizations, or of some specific employer organization or any employer organization or organizations.

